Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB330.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(e) of the act of July 2, 2019 (P.L.366, No.56), known as the Sports Raffle Charities Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Athletic event drawing.* * *(e) Distribution.--(1) The prize amount of an athletic event drawing shall be 50% of the total amount collected from the sale of athletic event drawing tickets. Except as provided under subsection (f), the other 50% of the total amount collected from the sale of athletic event drawing tickets shall be donated [within seven days from the date of the drawing by 123456789101112131415161718 the] by each affiliated nonprofit organization conducting [the] an athletic event drawing [to one] as follows : (i) Ninety-five percent shall be donated within seven days from the date of the drawing to one or more designated charitable organizations for which the drawing was conducted and shall be used exclusively for public interest purposes.(ii) Five percent shall be used to fund grants issued by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B (relating to Fire Company Grant Program) and C (relating to Emergency Medical Services Grant Program).(2) Beginning on the first June 30 one year after the effective date of this paragraph, and each June 30 thereafter, an affiliated nonprofit organization under paragraph (1) shall remit the amount collected under paragraph (1)(ii) in the prior year to the department. The department shall report the amount remitted under paragraph (1)(ii) to the State Treasurer . The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount to a restricted revenue account within the General Fund to fund grants issued by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B and C. * * *(k.1) Report.--(1) Each affiliated nonprofit organization that conducts an athletic event drawing shall compile a report with all of the following information for the prior year:(i) T he total amount collected from the sale of athletic event drawing tickets.(ii) The total amount donated to one or more 20250SB0330PN0287 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated charitable organizations for which the athletic event drawing was conducted under subsection (e)(1)(i).(iii) The total amount remitted under subsection (e)(1)(ii) to fund grants issued by the Office of State Fire Commissioner under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 78 Subchs. B and C.(2) No later than the first September 30 following the first remittance date under subsection (e)(2), and each September 30 thereafter, each affiliated nonprofit organization shall submit the report under paragraph (1) to the State Treasurer on a form prescribed by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall submit the report to all of the following:(i) The department.(ii) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(iv) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(v) The chair and minority chair of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0330PN0287 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526